Florida, session 2026, SB980.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 35 36 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âFlorida Age-Gate 37 Act.â 38 Section 2.âSection 569.31, Florida Statutes, is reordered 39 and amended to read: 40 569.31âDefinitions.âAs used in this part, the term: 41 (2)(1)ââDealerâ is synonymous with the term âretail 42 nicotine products dealer.â 43 (3)(2)ââDivisionâ means the Division of Alcoholic Beverages 44 and Tobacco of the Department of Business and Professional 45 Regulation. 46 (4)(3)ââFDAâ means the United States Food and Drug 47 Administration. 48 (5)(4)ââNicotine dispensing deviceâ means any product that 49 employs an electronic, chemical, or mechanical means to produce 50 vapor or aerosol from a nicotine product, including, but not 51 limited to, an electronic cigarette, electronic cigar, 52 electronic cigarillo, electronic pipe, or other similar device 53 or product, any replacement cartridge for such device, and any 54 other container of nicotine in a solution or other form intended 55 to be used with or within an electronic cigarette, electronic 56 cigar, electronic cigarillo, electronic pipe, or other similar 57 device or product. For purposes of this definition, each 58 individual stock keeping unit is considered a separate nicotine 59 dispensing device. 60 (6)(5)ââNicotine productâ means any product that contains 61 nicotine, including liquid nicotine, which is intended for human 62 consumption, whether inhaled, chewed, absorbed, dissolved, or 63 ingested by any means. The term also includes any nicotine 64 dispensing device. The term does not include a: 65 (a)âTobacco product, as defined in s. 569.002; 66 (b)âProduct regulated as a drug or device by the United 67 States Food and Drug Administration under Chapter V of the 68 Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act; or 69 (c)âProduct that contains incidental nicotine. 70 (7)(6)ââNicotine products manufacturerâ means any person or 71 entity that manufactures nicotine products. 72 (8)ââNon-FDA-authorized nicotine dispensing deviceâ means 73 any nicotine dispensing device, including any single-use device, 74 nonrefillable closed system cartridge device, or disposable 75 device, which has not received a marketing authorization order 76 under 21 U.S.C. s. 387j from the Food and Drug Administration. 77 (9)(7)ââPermitâ is synonymous with the term âretail 78 nicotine products dealer permit.â 79 (10)(8)ââRetail nicotine products dealerâ means the holder 80 of a retail nicotine products dealer permit. 81 (11)(9)ââRetail nicotine products dealer permitâ means a 82 permit issued by the division under s. 569.32. 83 (12)(10)ââSelf-service merchandisingâ means the open 84 display of nicotine products, whether packaged or otherwise, for 85 direct retail customer access and handling before purchase 86 without the intervention or assistance of the dealer or the 87 dealerâs owner, employee, or agent. An open display of such 88 products and devices includes the use of an open display unit. 89 (13)(11)ââSellâ or âsaleâ means, in addition to its common 90 usage meaning, any sale, transfer, exchange, barter, gift, or 91 offer for sale and distribution, in any manner or by any means. 92 (1)(12)ââAny person under the age of 21â does not include 93 any person under the age of 21 who: 94 (a)âIs in the military reserve or on active duty in the 95 Armed Forces of the United States; or 96 (b)âIs acting within the scope of in his or her scope of 97 lawful employment. 98 Section 3.âSection 569.33, Florida Statutes, is amended to 99 read: 100 569.33âConsent to inspection and search without warrant.â 101 (1)âAn applicant for a retail nicotine products dealer 102 permit, by accepting the permit when issued, agrees that the 103 place or premises covered by the permit is subject to inspection 104 and search without a search warrant by the division or its 105 authorized assistants, and by sheriffs, deputy sheriffs, or 106 police officers, to determine compliance with this part. 107 (2)âIn addition to subsection (1), an applicant consents to 108 inspection and search without a search warrant of the licensed 109 premises by the Department of Law Enforcement for violations 110 involving the unlawful sale, advertising, promotion, or display 111 for sale of non-FDA-authorized nicotine dispensing devices as 112 defined in s. 569.31. 113 (3)âThe division shall conduct regular inspections of the 114 licensed premises of dealers that sell non-FDA-authorized 115 nicotine dispensing devices to ensure compliance with this part. 116 Section 4.âSection 569.35, Florida Statutes, is amended to 117 read: 118 569.35âRetail nicotine product dealers; administrative 119 penalties.â 120 (1)âThe division may suspend or revoke the permit of a 121 dealer, including the retail tobacco products dealer permit of a 122 retail tobacco products dealer as defined in s. 569.002 s. 123 569.002(4), upon sufficient cause appearing of the violation of 124 any of the provisions of this part, by a dealer, or by a 125 dealerâs agent or employee. 126 (2)(a)âThe division may also assess and accept an 127 administrative fine of up to $1,000 against a dealer for each 128 violation. The division shall deposit all fines collected into 129 the General Revenue Fund as collected. 130 (b)âFor each violation involving the sale of a non-FDA 131 authorized nicotine dispensing device, or the advertising, 132 promoting, or displaying for sale of such device, the division 133 may impose the following penalties: 134 1.âFor a first violation, an administrative fine between 135 $500 to $1,000 and an order requiring corrective action within 136 15 days. 137 2.âFor a second violation, an administrative fine between 138 $1,000 to $2,500 and an order requiring corrective action within 139 3 days. 140 3.âFor a third violation, an administrative fine between 141 $2,500 to $5,000 and suspension of the dealerâs permit for 30 142 days. 143 4.âFor a fourth violation, an administrative fine of no 144 less than $5,000 and suspension of the dealerâs permit for 90 145 days. 146 5.âFor a fifth or subsequent violation, revocation of the 147 dealerâs permit. 148 (3)âIn addition to any administrative penalties under 149 subparagraph (b)3., a dealer, or a dealerâs agent or employee, 150 who commits a third or subsequent violation within 12 weeks 151 after the first violation commits a misdemeanor of the second 152 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 153 (4)âAn order imposing an administrative fine becomes 154 effective 15 days after the date of the order. The division may 155 suspend the imposition of a penalty against a dealer, 156 conditioned upon the dealerâs compliance with terms the division 157 considers appropriate. 158 (5)âThe division and the Department of Law Enforcement 159 shall use the administrative fines assessed pursuant to 160 subsection (2) to: 161 (a)âIncrease enforcement personnel; 162 (b)âFund compliance inspections and investigations; and 163 (c)âDevelop and implement public awareness campaigns to 164 reduce nicotine use by persons younger than 21 years of age. 165 Section 5.âSection 569.37, Florida Statutes, is reordered 166 and amended to read: 167 569.37âSale or delivery of nicotine products; restrictions; 168 exemptions.â 169 (1)âIn order to prevent persons younger than under 21 years 170 of age from purchasing or receiving nicotine products, the sale 171 or delivery of nicotine products is prohibited, except: 172 (a)âWhen under the direct control or line of sight of the 173 dealer or the dealerâs agent or employee; or 174 (b)âSales from a vending machine are prohibited under 175 paragraph (a) and are only permissible from a machine that is 176 equipped with an operational lockout device that is under the 177 control of the dealer or the dealerâs agent or employee who 178 directly regulates the sale of items through the machine by 179 triggering the lockout device to allow the dispensing of one 180 nicotine product. The lockout device must include a mechanism to 181 prevent the machine from functioning if the power source for the 182 lockout device fails or if the lockout device is disabled and a 183 mechanism to ensure that only one nicotine product is dispensed 184 at a time. 185 (2)(a)âA dealer that sells nicotine products may not sell, 186 permit to be sold, offer for sale, or display for sale such 187 products or devices by means of self-service merchandising. 188 (b)âA dealer that sells nicotine products may not place 189 such products or devices in an open display unit unless the unit 190 is located in an area that is inaccessible to customers. 191 (6)(3)âThe provisions of Subsections (1), (2), and (3) do 192 not (2) shall not apply to an establishment that prohibits 193 persons younger than under 21 years of age on the licensed 194 premises. 195 (4)âA dealer or a dealerâs agent or employee shall must 196 require proof of age of a purchaser of a nicotine product before 197 selling the product to that person, unless the purchaser appears 198 to be 30 years of age or older. 199 (5)(a)âNotwithstanding this part, products manufactured by 200 a company that has received at least one marketing authorization 201 order under 21 U.S.C. s. 387j are not restricted under this 202 section, provided such products are sold exclusively in 203 compliance with the related age restrictions of this state. 204 (b)âFor purposes of this section, the exemption extends to 205 all: 206 1.âStock-keeping units marketed by such manufacturer under 207 the same brand family as the authorized product; and 208 2.âClosed-system, replaceable-cartridge devices designed 209 exclusively for use with a proprietary, reusable, rechargeable 210 device for which a marketing authorization order has been 211 granted. 212 (3)(a)âA dealer that allows persons younger than 21 years 213 of age on the licensed premises, and that sells a non-FDA 214 authorized nicotine dispensing device, may not advertise, 215 promote, or display for sale such devices in a manner that is 216 visible to: 217 1.âAny person outside the licensed premises; or 218 2.âAny person younger than 21 years of age who is inside 219 the licensed premises, including any open display unit. 220 (b)âA dealer that prohibits persons younger than 21 years 221 of age on the licensed premises, and that sells a nicotine 222 dispensing device that has received a marketing authorization 223 order under 21 U.S.C. s. 387j, may advertise, promote, or 224 display for sale such devices in areas visible inside or outside 225 the licensed premises. 226 (c)âNotwithstanding paragraph (a), products manufactured by 227 a company with at least one FDA marketing authorization order 228 issued under 21 U.S.C. s. 387j are not restricted under this 229 subsection, provided such products are sold exclusively in 230 compliance with state age restrictions requirements. For 231 purposes of this paragraph, the exemption also applies to all: 232 1.âStock-keeping units within the same brand family as the 233 authorized product; and 234 2.âClosed-system, replaceable-cartridge devices designed 235 exclusively for use with a proprietary, reusable, rechargeable 236 device for which a marketing authorization order has been 237 granted. 238 Section 6.âSection 569.39, Florida Statutes, is amended to 239 read: 240 569.39âRulemaking authority.âThe division shall adopt rules 241 to administer and enforce this part. The rules must include 242 guidelines for compliance audits and enforcement actions 243 pertaining to the advertising, promoting, or displaying for sale 244 of any non-FDA-authorized nicotine dispensing devices and must 245 expressly authorize establishments that prohibit persons younger 246 than 21 years of age on the licensed premises to sell single-use 247 nicotine dispensing devices that have not received a marketing 248 authorization order issued under 21 U.S.C. s. 387j, consistent 249 with s. 569.37(5). 250 Section 7.âPresent subsection (3) of section 569.44, 251 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (4) and amended, 252 and a new subsection (3) is added to that section, to read: 253 569.44âAnnual report.âThe division shall report annually 254 with written findings to the Legislature and the Governor by 255 December 31 on the progress of implementing the enforcement 256 provisions of this part. This must include, but is not limited 257 to: 258 (3)âThe number of dealers cited for violations of s. 259 569.37(3) for advertising, promoting, or displaying for sale a 260 non-FDA-authorized nicotine dispensing device, and the penalties 261 imposed. 262 (4)(3)âThe number of violations for selling nicotine 263 products to persons younger than under age 21 years of age and 264 the results of administrative hearings on the above and related 265 issues. 266 Section 8.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.